Maryland, session 2025, HB1432.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–305.
(a) This section applies to the following minority business enterprises:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1432*

HOUSE BILL 1432
(1) a publicly owned business if 1 or more minority persons own at least
51% of the stock of the business; or
(2) any other business if 1 or more minority persons own at least 50% of
the business.
(b) Subject to the limitations of any law that governs the activities of other units
of the Executive Branch of the State government, the Special Secretary shall:
(1) carry out each State or federal program that is created to promote the
growth of or participation in minority business enterprises;
(2) promote and coordinate training regarding the requirements of the
Minority Business Enterprise Program;
(3) promote, coordinate, and participate in the plans, programs, and
operations of the State government that promote or otherwise affect the establishment,
preservation, and strengthening of minority business enterprises;
(4) promote activities and the use of the resources of the State government,
local governments, and private entities for the growth of minority business enterprises,
INCLUDING:
(I) COORDINATING WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE TO
PROMOTE EXISTING BENEFITS AND INCENTIVES, INCLUDING TAX INCENTIVES,
GRANTS, AND TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE, FOR MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISES
OPERATING IN ENTERPRISE ZONES AND TO ENCOURAGE MINORITY BUSINESS
ENTERPRISE PARTICIPATION IN ENTERPRISE ZONES; AND
(II) COORDINATING WITH THE OFFICE OF THE COMPTROLLER
TO PROMOTE EXISTING BENEFITS AND INCENTIVES, INCLUDING TAX INCENTIVES,
TO SUPPORT THE GROWTH OF MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISES;
(5) coordinate the effort of private entities and public agencies to develop
minority business enterprises;
(6) establish a system to develop, collect, summarize, and give out
information that would help a person to:
(i) establish a minority business enterprise;
(ii) operate a minority business enterprise successfully; or
(iii) promote the establishment and successful operation of minority
business enterprises;

HOUSE BILL 1432 3
(7) establish a mentoring program:
(i) in which larger and more established minority businesses can
mentor start–up and small minority businesses; and
(ii) that incentivizes mentor participation by providing benefits to
mentors, including:
1. special recognition on the Office website, and in the Office
newsletter and participation updates;
2. a certificate of participation awarded by the Office;
3. the opportunity to present highlights of mentor and
protege relationships at an annual appreciation event sponsored by the Office; and
4. increased networking and educational opportunities;
(8) conduct a feasibility study for creating a technical assistance program
in the Office that provides one–on–one assistance to minority businesses in submitting
competitive and successful bids and proposals for procurement contracts;
(9) provide training and educational opportunities for nonminority prime
contractors regarding the duties and responsibilities of a prime contractor with respect to
minority businesses; and
(10) subject to the limitations of law and the availability of funds:
(i) provide technical and managerial assistance to minority
business enterprises;
(ii) provide the managerial and organizational framework for
private entities and units of the State government to plan and carry out joint undertakings
that relate to minority business enterprises;
(iii) pay, wholly or partly, the costs of a pilot or demonstration project
that is intended to overcome the special problems of minority business enterprises; and
(iv) establish an annual awards program to recognize localities that
demonstrate the highest excellence in minority business enterprise support.
9–306.
(a) On or before the 15th day of each regular session of the General Assembly, the
Special Secretary shall send an annual report on the Office of Small, Minority, and Women
Business Affairs:

HOUSE BILL 1432
(1) to the Governor; and
(2) subject to § 2–1257 of this article, to the General Assembly.
(b) The annual report may be prepared in conjunction with the report required
under § 14–305(b) of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Governor’s Office of
Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs, in consultation with the Department of
Commerce and the Office of the Comptroller, shall include in the annual report submitted
under § 9–306 of the State Government Article in 2026, 2027, and 2028 an analysis of the
coordination efforts required under § 9–305(b)(4) of the State Government Article, as
enacted by Section 1 of this Act, including the impact of these efforts on minority business
enterprises in the State, and any recommended statutory changes to improve coordination
efforts.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.